Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.120

Park commissioners as officers of district—Organization.

(1) The officers of a metropolitan park district must be a board of park commissioners consisting of five members. The board must annually elect one of their number as president and another of their number as clerk of the board.

(2) Notwithstanding the foregoing, when the boundaries of any metropolitan park district are coterminous with the boundaries of a city, and if the governing body of a city is designated to serve in an ex officio capacity as the board, the number of members of the board of park commissioners must be equal to the number of positions on the relevant city governing body as it may be constituted from time to time.

[ 2017 c 215 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.120. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-4, part; prior: 1919 c 135 s 1, part; 1907 c 98 s 4; RRS s 6723, part.]